Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Penalties

280.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (3) of KRS

280.250

or any of the provisions of KRS

280.260

shall, for the first offense, forfeit twenty-five dollars ($25) to the person aggrieved, and shall, for every subsequent offense, forfeit one hundred dollars ($100) to the person aggrieved, but the person aggrieved shall not recover the forfeiture after a prosecution has been instituted under subsection (2) of this section. The forfeiture may be recovered by the person aggrieved by ordinary action in any court having jurisdiction to render judgment for the sum claimed to be forfeited, and the judgment may be enforced by execution against the property or against the person, at the election of the plaintiff.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (3) of KRS

280.250

or any of the provisions of KRS

280.260

shall be liable to a fine of fifty dollars ($50) for the first offense and one hundred dollars ($100) for each subsequent offense, but no conviction shall be had under this subsection in any case where the person aggrieved has sued for and recovered the forfeiture prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

280.270

shall be fined twenty dollars ($20) for each day that the violation continues.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

280.280

shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than ten dollars ($10) for each day that the violation continues.

History.

850, 852, 1342a-3, 1809a, 1814, 1815, 1816, 1818, 1819, 1820, 1821a-2, 4356za-17, 4356za-23: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 266, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 113, § 7, effective July 13, 1984.